Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [383A.151] RAMSEY COUNTY ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Creation. new text end new text begin (a) There is created in the county of Ramsey a public body, corporate and politic, known as the Ramsey County Economic Development Authority, that has the powers contained in sections 469.090 to 469.108, except for sections 469.101, subdivision 19, 469.102, and 469.107; the powers of a housing and redevelopment authority under sections 469.001 to 469.047; and the powers of a city under sections 469.124 to 469.133. For the purposes of applying chapter 469 to the county of Ramsey, the county has all the powers and duties of a city; the county board has all the powers and duties of a governing body; the chair of the county board has all the powers and duties of a mayor; and, with respect to the exercise of the powers under section 469.008, the area of operation includes the area within the territorial boundaries of the county. new text end new text begin (b) Section 469.1082 does not apply to the county of Ramsey, except for section 469.1082, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioners. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 469 or other law to the contrary, the Ramsey County Economic Development Authority consists of seven commissioners. The county board must appoint the commissioners and fill vacancies in the office of any commissioner. Pursuant to Ramsey County Resolution No. 94-357, dated July 26, 1994, the Ramsey County Board of Commissioners also constitutes the Ramsey County Housing and Redevelopment Authority. The board may, by resolution, appoint the sitting commissioners of the Ramsey County Housing and Redevelopment Authority as commissioners of the Ramsey County Economic Development Authority, the terms of each commissioner corresponding accordingly. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of Ramsey County and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [383A.152] RAMSEY COUNTY HOUSING AND REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY; ADDITIONAL POWERS. new text end new text begin The Ramsey County Housing and Redevelopment Authority, established pursuant to Ramsey County Resolution No. 93-155, dated March 9, 1993, shall have the powers and duties of the Ramsey County Economic Development Authority under section 383A.151 and shall retain all the powers of a housing and redevelopment authority under sections 469.001 to 469.047. For the purposes of applying chapter 469 to the county of Ramsey, the county has all the powers and duties of a city; the county board has all the powers and duties of a governing body; the chair of the county has all the powers and duties of a mayor; and, with respect to the exercise of the powers under section 469.008, the area of operation includes the area within the territorial boundaries of the county. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of Ramsey County and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end